Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.160

Criminal penalties—Prosecutions.

Any person who shall violate any provision of this chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars, or imprisonment in a county jail for a term not to exceed thirty days, or both. Criminal prosecutions for violations of this chapter shall be prosecuted by the prosecuting attorney in the county in which the violation occurred.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 212 s 16.]